Wisconsin, session 2025, AB431.
do enact as follows:AB431,11Section 1. 802.065 of the statutes is created to read:AB431,2,32802.065 Special motion to strike strategic lawsuits against public 3participation. (1) In this section:AB431,2,44(a) “Complaint” includes a complaint, cross-complaint, or petition.AB431,3,11(b) “Defendant” includes a defendant, cross-defendant, or respondent.AB431,3,22(c) “Plaintiff” includes a plaintiff, cross-complainant, or petitioner.AB431,3,83(2) (a) A cause of action against a person arising from any act of that person in 4furtherance of the person’s right of petition or free speech under the U.S. 5Constitution or the constitution of this state in connection with a public issue shall 6be subject to a special motion to strike, unless the court determines that the 7plaintiff has established that there is a probability that the plaintiff will prevail on 8the claim.AB431,3,119(b) In making its determination, the court shall consider the pleadings and 10supporting and opposing affidavits stating the facts upon which the liability or 11defense is based.AB431,3,1712(c) If the court determines that the plaintiff has established a probability that 13the plaintiff will prevail on the claim, neither that determination nor the fact of that 14determination shall be admissible in evidence at any later stage of the case, or in 15any subsequent action, and no burden of proof or degree of proof otherwise 16applicable shall be affected by that determination in any later stage of the case or in 17any subsequent proceeding.AB431,3,2218(3) (a) Except as provided in par. (b), in any action subject to sub. (2), a 19prevailing defendant on a special motion to strike shall be entitled to recover his or 20her attorney fees and costs. If the court finds that a special motion to strike is 21frivolous or is solely intended to cause unnecessary delay, the court shall award 22costs and reasonable attorney fees to a plaintiff prevailing on the motion.AB431,4,423(b) A defendant who prevails on a special motion to strike in an action subject 1to par. (a) may not be awarded attorney fees under par. (a) if that cause of action is 2brought under s. 19.37 or 19.97. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to 3prevent a prevailing party from recovering attorney fees and costs under s. 19.37 or 419.97.AB431,4,75(4) This section does not apply to any enforcement action brought in the name 6of the people of this state by the attorney general, a district attorney, or a city 7attorney, acting as a public prosecutor.AB431,4,108(5) As used in this section, an act in furtherance of a person’s right of petition 9or free speech under the U.S. Constitution or the constitution of this state in 10connection with a public issue includes any of the following:AB431,4,1211(a) Any written or oral statement or writing made before a legislative, 12executive, or judicial proceeding, or any other official proceeding authorized by law.AB431,4,1513(b) Any written or oral statement or writing made in connection with an issue 14under consideration or review by a legislative, executive, or judicial body, or any 15other official proceeding authorized by law.AB431,4,1716(c) Any written or oral statement or writing made in a place open to the public 17or a public forum in connection with an issue of public interest.AB431,4,2018(d) Any other conduct in furtherance of the exercise of the constitutional right 19of petition or the constitutional right of free speech in connection with a public issue 20or an issue of public interest.AB431,5,221(6) A special motion to strike under this section may be filed within 60 days of 22the service of the complaint or, in the court’s discretion, at any later time upon 23terms it determines are proper. The motion shall be scheduled for a hearing not 1more than 30 days after the service of the motion unless the court’s schedule does 2not allow for a hearing within the 30-day timeframe.AB431,5,53(7) (a) All discovery proceedings in the action shall be stayed upon the filing of 4a notice of motion made under this section. The stay of discovery shall remain in 5effect until notice of entry of the order ruling on the motion.AB431,5,76(b) Notwithstanding par. (a), the court may, for good cause shown, order that 7specified discovery be conducted.AB431,5,98(8) Notwithstanding s. 808.03 (1), an order granting or denying a special 9motion to strike shall be appealable as a matter of right.AB431,5,1610(9) (a) Any party who files a special motion to strike under this section, and 11any party who files an opposition to a special motion to strike, shall, promptly upon 12so filing, transmit to the director of state courts, by mail or by email, a copy of the 13endorsed, filed caption page of the motion or opposition, a copy of any related notice 14or appeal or petition for a writ, and a conformed copy of any order issued under this 15section, including any order granting or denying a special motion to strike, 16discovery, or fees.AB431,5,1917(b) The director of state courts shall maintain a public record of information 18transmitted under this paragraph for at least 3 years, and may store the 19information on microfilm or other appropriate electronic media.AB431,5,2120(10) This section shall be construed broadly to favor protection of the 21constitutional rights of petition and free speech.AB431,222Section 2. Initial applicability.AB431,6,11(1) This act first applies to actions filed on the effective date of this subsection.AB431,6,22